Tennessee, session 114, SB2376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-502(c)(4), is amended by
deleting the last sentence of the subdivision and substituting:
The court shall hold a hearing on the motion no later than twenty (20) days from the date
the motion is filed.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2376
012502
- 1 -